New Jersey, session 221, A5389.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Upon the retail sale or transfer of any firearm, a wholesale dealer or wholesale dealers employee and retail dealer or retail dealers employee shall deliver a written disclosure, that the purchaser or transferee is required to sign and receive a copy of, with the following information printed in block letters not less than one-fourth of an inch in height: IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAW, IF YOUR FIREARM IS LOST OR STOLEN, YOU ARE REQUIRED TO REPORT THIS WITHIN 36 HOURS TO THE CHIEF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OF THE MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE LOSS OR THEFT OCCURRED OR IF THE MUNICIPALITY DOES NOT HAVE A LOCAL POLICE FORCE, YOU MUST REPORT THE LOST OR STOLEN FIREARM TO THE SUPERINTENDENT OF STATE POLICE. PLEASE BE AWARE THAT IT IS ILLEGAL TO PURCHASE A FIREARM WITH THE INTENT TO UNLAWFULLY SELL IT TO ANY OTHER PERSON. A firearm wholesale or retail dealer shall collect and maintain a copy of each disclosure signed by a purchaser or transferee as provided in this subsection for a period of not less than 15 years.  Any firearm wholesale or retail dealer who violates the provisions of this act shall be subject to the penalties pursuant to subsection c. of this section. b.    Every firearm wholesale and retail dealer shall conspicuously post at each purchase counter the following disclosure, printed in block letters not less than one inch in height: IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE LAW, IF YOUR FIREARM IS LOST OR STOLEN, YOU ARE REQUIRED TO REPORT THIS WITHIN 36 HOURS TO THE CHIEF LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER OF THE MUNICIPALITY WHERE THE LOSS OR THEFT OCCURRED OR IF THE MUNICIPALITY DOES NOT HAVE A LOCAL POLICE FORCE, YOU MUST REPORT THE LOST OR STOLEN FIREARM TO THE SUPERINTENDENT OF STATE POLICE. PLEASE BE AWARE THAT IT IS ILLEGAL TO PURCHASE A FIREARM WITH THE INTENT TO UNLAWFULLY SELL IT TO ANY OTHER PERSON. c.     Any firearm wholesale or retail dealer that violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $500 for a first offense and up to $1,000 for any subsequent offense.  The civil penalty shall be collected pursuant to the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.), in a summary proceeding before the municipal court having jurisdiction. An official authorized by statute or ordinance to enforce the laws of this State, or a law enforcement officer having enforcement authority in that municipality, shall issue a summons for a violation of the provisions of this section, and shall serve and execute all processes with respect to the enforcement of this section consistent with the Rules of Court.  A penalty recovered under the provisions of this subsection shall be recovered in the name of the State by the municipality.  All penalties collected pursuant to this subsection shall be forwarded to the Office of Attorney General to be used for gun violence prevention efforts. d.    In accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), the Superintendent of State Police may promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment.